Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 620.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, when the court is petitioned to remove or
continue the removal of a child from the custody of his or her parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision, the court shall first consider
whether the child may be reasonably protected against the alleged dependency,
neglect or abuse, by alternatives less restrictive than removal. Such alternatives may
include, but shall not be limited to, the provision of medical, educational,
psychiatric, psychological, social work, counseling, day care, or homemaking
services with monitoring wherever necessary by the cabinet or other appropriate
agency. Where the court specifically finds that such alternatives are adequate to
reasonably protect the child against the alleged dependency, neglect or abuse, the
court shall not order the removal or continued removal of the child.
(2) If the court orders the removal or continues the removal of the child, services
provided to the parent and the child shall be designed to promote the protection of
the child and the return of the child safely to the child's home as soon as possible.
The cabinet shall develop a treatment plan for each child designed to meet the needs
of the child. The cabinet may change the child's placement or treatment plan as the
cabinet may require. The cabinet shall notify the committing court of the change, in
writing, within fourteen (14) days after the change has been implemented.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 4:35 PM Jacketed